Florida, session 2026, HB237.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Present subsection (10) of section 464.015,
Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (11), and a new
subsection (10) is added to that section, to read:
464.015 Titles and abbreviations; restrictions; penalty.—
(10) Only a person who holds a license in this state or a
multistate license pursuant to s. 464.0095 to practice
professional nursing or to perform nursing services is
authorized to use the title Doctor of Nursing Practice and the
abbreviation "D.N.P.," the title Doctor of Philosophy and the
abbreviation "Ph.D.," or other titles or abbreviations
authorized under his or her practice act. Doctoral degree
holders must specify their profession when using the term
"doctor."
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb237-00